Montana, session 2025, SB128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-1-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-1-301. Election administrator. (1) (a) The county clerk and recorder of each county is the
election administrator unless the governing body of the county designates another official or appoints an
election administrator.
(b) The governing body of the county may not remove the election administration responsibilities
from the county clerk and recorder during the county clerk and recorder's current term in office. The governing
body may remove the election administration responsibilities of the county clerk and recorder for future terms of
office.
(c) The county clerk and recorder may voluntarily give up their election administration
responsibilities during their current term in office.
(2) The election administrator is responsible for the administration of all procedures relating to
registration of electors and conduct of elections, shall keep all county records relating to elector registration and
elections, and is the primary point of contact for the county with respect to the statewide voter registration list
and implementation of other provisions of applicable federal law governing elections.
(3) The election administrator may appoint a deputy election administrator for each political
subdivision required to hold elections."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 128

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 128.1
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 128